New Jersey, session 222, A4432.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 4 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75d) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  Not later than February 1, 2025, the director shall promulgate a combined single application form consistent with the requirements of section 6 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75f) and the recommendations of the Stay NJ Task Force established pursuant to section 18 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75o) that shall be available on and after that date to be used by State residents to apply for the Stay NJ property tax credit, the ANCHOR property tax rebate, and the homestead property tax reimbursement program.  Applications shall be accepted by the Director of the Division of Taxation from February 1 through [October] December 31 of each year.  State residents seeking property tax benefits under those programs shall complete the entire application and file it with the director.  The director shall determine the amount of the Stay NJ property tax credit, ANCHOR rebate, and homestead property tax reimbursement, as applicable, provided to each applicant pursuant to the requirements of subsection b. of this section. b.  The director shall calculate the amount of each property tax benefit provided to an eligible claimant for each tax year in the following manner: (1)  if the eligible claimant qualifies for an ANCHOR rebate, the director shall first determine the amount of the eligible claimant's ANCHOR rebate for the tax year, the full amount of which shall be paid to the eligible claimant; (2)  if the eligible claimant qualifies for a homestead property tax reimbursement, the director shall next determine the amount of the eligible claimant's homestead property tax reimbursement for the tax year, the full amount of which shall be paid to the eligible claimant; (3)  if the eligible claimant qualifies for a Stay NJ property tax credit, the director shall then determine the amount of the eligible claimant's Stay NJ property tax credit for the tax year, of which the eligible claimant shall be paid an amount equal to 50 percent of the property taxes billed to the eligible claimant, up to the maximum amount permitted under section 3 of P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75c), less the amounts paid to the eligible claimant pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection. c.  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.88) d.  (1)  The director shall determine the amount of the Stay NJ property tax credit that shall be provided for each eligible claimant pursuant to P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.) based upon the information provided by the eligible claimant in the application or from any other information as may be available to the director and shall notify the applicant of the determined amount, in writing and at such time as the director may deem appropriate, together with a detailed calculation of the amount that the eligible claimant is entitled to receive pursuant to subsection b. of this section. (2)  The format of the written information to be provided by the director shall be determined by the director and shall, at a minimum, display:  (a) the amount of the eligible claimant's property tax bill for the tax year; (b) the amount of the ANCHOR rebate, homestead property tax reimbursement, and Stay NJ property tax credit, as applicable, that the eligible claimant is entitled to receive; and (c) the actual property taxes that the eligible claimant shall pay in the tax year after any property tax credits are applied against the eligible claimant's property tax bill. (3)  Subject to the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq., such notification shall finally and irrevocably fix the amount of the Stay NJ property tax credit unless the applicant, within 90 days after having been given notice of such determination, shall apply to the director for a hearing or unless the director shall redetermine the same.  After such hearing, the director shall give notice of the final determination to the applicant. e.  An eligible claimant for a Stay NJ property tax credit authorized under P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.) who is aggrieved by any decision, order, finding, or denial by the director of all or part of that eligible claimant's Stay NJ property tax credit may appeal therefrom to the New Jersey Tax Court in accordance with the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq.  The appeal provided by this section shall be the exclusive remedy available to an applicant for review of a decision of a director in respect to the determination of all or a part of a Stay NJ property tax credit authorized under P.L.2023, c.75 (C.54:4-8.75a et al.). (cf:  P.L.2024, c.88, s.3) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.